North Dakota, session 69, HB1514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 23.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Definitions.
As used i n this chapter :
1. "Aircraft" means any contrivance invented, used, or designed for navigation or flight in
the air. The term includes a drone.
2. "Cloud seeding" means a type of weather modification that attempts to change the
amount or type of precipitation by dispersing chemicals into the air by means of an
aircraft or a ground generator, including silver iodide, potassium iodide, or dry ice.
3. "Director" means the director of the department of environmental quality.
4. "Stratospheric aerosol injection" means a method of solar radiation modification which
introduces aerosols into the atmosphere to reduce sunlight.
5. "Weather engineering" means altering or manipulating the weather.
6. "Xenobiotic" means a foreign substance to the human body or to an ecological
system.
Polluting atmospheric activity - Penalty.
1. A person may not engage in a polluting atmospheric activity or use an unmarked or
unidentified aircraft, vehicle, or facility for weather engineering, cloud seeding,
Page No. 1 25.1002.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
stratospheric aerosol injection, or other atmospheric activity that is harmful to a human
or the environment, including the production of excessive electromagnetic radiation.
2. Any person that violates this section is guilty of a class C felony and subject to a fine
of not more than five hundred thousand dollars.
Exemption.
This chapter does not apply to an individual who operates an aircraft for aerial application of
agricultural chemicals or materials.
Reporting and investigative requirements.
1. Any individual may report an aircraft, facility, or other delivery system used for weather
engineering, cloud seeding, stratospheric aerosol injection, or any atmospheric
experimentation involving the release of polluting emissions to the sheriff in the county
in which the activity was observed or suspected. If the sheriff finds the evidence
reported to be credible, the sheriff shall investigate the reported activity and may
report any prohibited activity to the county state's attorney for prosecution.
2. The director and each county sheriff shall encourage the public to monitor, measure,
document, and report any incident that may constitute cloud seeding, stratospheric
aerosol injection, weather engineering, or any other polluting atmospheric activity. An
individual with evidence of a polluting atmospheric activity may report the activity to
the director or the sheriff by submitting:
a. A photograph that includes the date, time, and location the photograph was
taken;
b. An independent precipitation analysis report, audiography, microscopy,
spectrometry, metering, or any other form of evidence; or
c. A video recording of activity involving the release of polluting atmospheric
emissions.
3. If the director suspects prohibited activity has occurred based on the evidence
provided, the director shall report all documentary and supportive evidence to the
sheriff in writing within twenty-four hours.
a. The director shall provide technical assistance and analysis of pollutants as
needed.
Page No. 2 25.1002.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. The sheriff may request assistance from the bureau of criminal investigation to
investigate any prohibited activity the sheriff suspects occurred or is occurring.
4. If a report is made to the director or a sheriff alleging polluting atmospheric emissions,
the director or sheriff shall investigate the source and content of the emissions. If the
emissions are harmful to humans or the environment, as demonstrated by a primary
scientific source, the sheriff shall take enforcement actions in accordance with this
chapter.
5. The director or sheriff shall take the following emergency measurements at the
reported location where a suspected violation of this chapter occurred within two hours
of receiving the report:
a. Excessive electromagnetic radiation or fields, including microwave or maser,
infrared light or laser, or ionizing or non-ionizing radiation; or
b. Excessive mechanical vibration, noise, or other physical agent.
6. If professional metering or monitoring equipment is needed but not available to the
state or county, the director or sheriff shall partner with an institution of higher
education to investigate and provide evidentiary findings that would qualify as scientific
expert testimony.
Enforcement actions.
1. If the director or sheriff has reason to believe an individual is violating, has violated, or
is attempting to violate this chapter, the director or sheriff shall issue and serve an
order to cease the activity.
2. The governor may request the adjutant general to identify and notify the owner or
operator of any aircraft or facility releasing aerosol emissions, electromagnetic
radiation, or other pollutants into the atmosphere to cease the activity. The adjutant
general shall order the operator of an aircraft releasing aerosol emissions,
electromagnetic radiation, or other pollutants into the atmosphere to land at the
nearest airport to be investigated for violating this chapter. The governor may request
the bureau of criminal investigation to investigate any activity that may violate this
chapter.
3. The governor may request the department of environmental quality for an
environmental study to investigate a violation of this chapter.
Page No. 3 25.1002.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
Xenobiotic agents and radiation - Enforcement.
If the director or sheriff receives information alleging weather engineering or other
atmospheric experimentation involving the release of a xenobiotic agent or the production of
harmful levels of electromagnetic radiation, the director or sheriff shall:
1. Immediately require the owner or operator of the facility, aircraft, or other vehicle
releasing the xenobiotic agent or producing electromagnetic radiation to produce a
record of any site where a xenobiotic agent or radiation has been detected and convey
the records to the director or sheriff.
2. Immediately order the owner or operator to cease operations of the facility, aircraft, or
other vehicle; and
3. Verify within twenty-four hours that the owner or operator has stopped all operations
relating to the release of xenobiotic agents or the production of electromagnetic
radiation.
Electromagnetic disturbances - Enforcement.
1. The director or sheriff immediately shall require the owner or operator of each tower,
antenna, or other facility or infrastructure to produce a record of any operation where
excessive xenobiotic electromagnetism and fields, mechanical vibrations, or other
physical agents, are or have been detected, specifically:
a. Radio frequency or microwave radiation at any reported publicly accessible
location in excess of negative eighty-five decibel-milliwatts;
b. Extreme-low-frequency alternating current electric fields in excess of one volt per
eighty-two feet [25 meters];
c. Magnetic fields in excess of one milligauss;
d. Ionizing radiation in excess of 0.02 millisievert per hour;
e. Laser or other light with harmful effects; and
f. Any vibration, noise, laser, sonic weapon, or other physical agent exceeding
building or biology guidelines.
2. The owner or operator shall convey the records to the director or sheriff within twenty-
four hours.
3. The director or sheriff shall:
Page No. 4 25.1002.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. Immediately order a cessation of operations of all antennas and other
deployments of energy or vibration emitted from the structure or facility.
b. Verify within twenty-four hours that the owner or operator has ceased all
operations of antennas and other deployments of energy or vibration; and
c. Refer suspected criminal activity to the county state's attorney for prosecution.
Page No. 5 25.1002.03000